Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 13 Safe Medications Practice Act

26-4-210.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe Medications Practice Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 195, § 1/HB 361.

26-4-211.
Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly finds and declares that:

Medications are essential for the effective treatment and prevention of illness and disease, and medications, particularly dangerous drugs, are recognized to be complex chemical compounds which may cause untoward side effects, adverse reactions, and other undesirable and potentially harmful effects;

Hospital pharmacists are highly trained in the therapeutic use of medications and have expertise in the safe, appropriate, and cost-effective use of medications; and

Therefore, it is essential that physicians, pharmacists, and other clinical health care practitioners in an institutional setting collaborate to promote safe and effective medication therapy for the institution’s patients.

The intent of the General Assembly in enacting this legislation is to maximize patient safety, to ensure safe and desirable medication therapy outcomes, and to achieve desired therapeutic goals.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 195, § 1/HB 361.

26-4-212.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Collaborate” means to work jointly with others as approved by an order from a physician member of the institution’s medical staff for care and treatment of the ordering physician’s patients or pursuant to a protocol established in accordance with medical staff policy.

“Hospital pharmacist” means a pharmacist that is employed by, or under contract with, an institution and practicing in an institutional setting.

“Institution” means any licensed hospital, nursing home, assisted living community, personal care home, or hospice.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 195, § 1/HB 361; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 9/SB 178.

26-4-213.
Collaboration.

Hospital pharmacists shall be authorized to collaborate with members of the medical staff in an institution on drug therapy management.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 195, § 1/HB 361.

26-4-214.
Role of State Board of Pharmacy and Georgia Composite Medical Board in establishing rules and regulations.

The State Board of Pharmacy shall establish rules and regulations governing a hospital pharmacist acting pursuant to Code Section 26-4-213 in the provision of drug therapy management in institutions in consultation or collaboration with physicians. Such rules may include the utilization of a hospital pharmacist’s skills regarding dangerous drugs to promote medication safety. Such rules shall include the ordering of clinical laboratory tests in the institutional setting and the interpretation of results related to medication use when approved by a physician member of the institution’s medical staff for the care and treatment of the ordering physician’s patients or pursuant to a protocol established in accordance with medical staff policy.

The Georgia Composite Medical Board shall establish rules and regulations governing a physician acting pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-4-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 195, § 1/HB 361.

Cross references.

Georgia Composite Medical Board, §

43-34-1

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “institution’s” was substituted for “institutions’s” in the last sentence of subsection (a).